Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1218YC (2) 91 jm/md H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 24.2A, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (07) For budgets for fiscal years 3 beginning on or after July 1, 2026, a comparison of the amount 4 of property taxes due on the ownerâs or taxpayerâs property for 5 the current fiscal year and the estimate of the proposed amount 6 of property taxes due on the ownerâs or taxpayerâs property for 7 the budget year, including the percentage in change in such 8 amounts. 9 Sec. 2. Section 24.2A, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 10 by adding the following new paragraph: 11 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. Notwithstanding deadlines under 12 paragraphs âaâ and âbâ , if the state percentage of growth for 13 the applicable fiscal year under section 257.8 is enacted after 14 March 1, the deadlines for each political subdivision under 15 paragraphs âaâ and âbâ shall be extended by fifteen days after 16 enactment of the state percentage of growth. 17